Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 4.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201076-2213.01
Uniform Standards
of Professional Appraisal Practice, defined.

Uniform
Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice means the standards promulgated
by the Appraisal Foundation as
the standards existed on January 1, 2010.

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 11;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 76-2218.01;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 31;

Laws 2007, LB186, § 5;

Laws 2008, LB1011, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB931, § 4.